North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-37 Agriculture in the Classroom [Repealed]

4-37-01.
Agriculture in the classroom program. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; 2011, ch. 63, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-37-02.
Agriculture in the classroom council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; 2001, ch. 78, § 1; 2007, ch. 36, § 18; 2011, ch. 63, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-37-03.
Purpose — Powers and duties. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; 1993, ch. 62, § 1; 2003, ch. 30, § 8; 2003, ch. 138, § 3; 2005, ch. 9, § 10; 2011, ch. 63, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-37-04.
Gifts and grants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; 2003, ch. 30, § 9; 2005, ch. 9, § 11; 2011, ch. 63, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

4-37-05.
Expenses of council members. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 106, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 61, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.